New York, session 2025-2026, A4721.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 6 of section 596 of the labor 2 law, as amended by chapter 369 of the laws of 2008, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 (a)(1) Unemployment benefits are subject to federal, state and local 5 income tax; 6 (2) Requirements exist pertaining to estimated tax payments; 7 (3) The individual may elect to have federal and/or state income tax 8 deducted and withheld from the individual's payment of unemployment 9 benefits at the amount specified under the federal internal revenue code 10 (26 U.S.C.A. 3402(p)(2)) and/or [the] an amount equal to four percent of 11 such payment for the purpose of the state income tax withholding [tax 12 schedules as specified under the tax law and relevant regulations]; 13 [and] 14 (4) The individual shall be permitted to change a previously elected 15 withholding status[.]; and 16 (5) Even if the individual elects to have federal and/or state income 17 tax deducted and withheld from the individual's payment of unemployment 18 benefits, additional tax may still be due as prescribed for such tax 19 payment under the tax law. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08480-01-5